Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201916-314
Mayor; legislative recommendations; jurisdiction.

The mayor of a city of the first class shall, from time to time, communicate to the city council such information and recommend such measures as in his or her opinion may tend to the improvement of the finances of the city, the police, health, comfort, and general prosperity of the city, and may have such jurisdiction as may be invested in him or her by ordinance over all places within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city, for the enforcement of health or quarantine ordinances and the regulation thereof.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 21, p. 235;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 2, p. 307;

R.S.1913, § 4880;

C.S.1922, § 4048;

C.S.1929, § 16-310;

R.S.1943, § 16-314;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 58;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 9.
September 1, 2019